Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin METROPOLITAN CITIES INFLOW AND INFILTRATION GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $20,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Metropolitan Council for grants to cities within the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2, for capital improvements in municipal wastewater collection systems to reduce the amount of inflow and infiltration to the Metropolitan Council's metropolitan sanitary sewer disposal system. Grants from this appropriation are for up to 50 percent of the cost to mitigate inflow and infiltration in the publicly owned municipal wastewater collection systems. To be eligible for a grant, a city must be identified by the council as a contributor of excessive inflow and infiltration in the metropolitan disposal system or have a measured flow rate within 20 percent of its allowable council-determined inflow and infiltration limits. The council must award grants based on applications from cities that identify eligible capital costs and include a timeline for inflow and infiltration mitigation construction, pursuant to guidelines established by the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $20,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end